Utah statutes.
57-12-12.   Judicial review.
(1)  Any person aggrieved by an order concerning relocation assistance may
obtain judicial review.
(2)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in the
district court of the county in which the real property taken for public use
is located.
